Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required academic standards. (a) The following subject areas are required for statewide accountability: (1) language arts; (2) mathematics, deleted text begin encompassingdeleted text end new text begin including elements ofnew text end algebra deleted text begin II, integrated mathematics III, or an equivalent in high school, and to be prepared for the three credits of mathematics in grades 9 through 12, the grade 8 standards include completion of algebradeleted text end new text begin , geometry, and statisticsnew text end ; (3) science, including earth and space science, life science, and the physical sciences, including chemistry and physics; (4) social studies, including history, geography, economics, and government and citizenship that includes civics; (5) physical education; (6) health; and (7) the arts. Public elementary and middle schools must offer at least three and require at least two of the following five arts areas: dance; media arts; music; theater; and visual arts. Public high schools must offer at least three and require at least one of the following five arts areas: media arts; dance; music; theater; and visual arts. (b) For purposes of applicable federal law, the academic standards for language arts, mathematics, and science apply to all public school students, except the very few students with extreme cognitive or physical impairments for whom an individualized education program team has determined that the required academic standards are inappropriate. An individualized education program team that makes this determination must establish alternative standards. (c) A school district may include child sexual abuse prevention instruction in a health curriculum, consistent with paragraph (a), clause (6). Child sexual abuse prevention instruction may include age-appropriate instruction on recognizing sexual abuse and assault, boundary violations, and ways offenders groom or desensitize victims, as well as strategies to promote disclosure, reduce self-blame, and mobilize bystanders. A school district may provide instruction under this paragraph in a variety of ways, including at an annual assembly or classroom presentation. A school district may also provide parents information on the warning signs of child sexual abuse and available resources. (d) District efforts to develop, implement, or improve instruction or curriculum as a result of the provisions of this section must be consistent with sections 120B.10, 120B.11, and 120B.20. (e) Locally developed academic standards in health apply until statewide rules implementing statewide health standards under subdivision 3 are required to be implemented in the classroom. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.024, is amended to read: 120B.024 CREDITS. Subdivision 1. Graduation requirements. (a) Students must successfully complete the following high school level credits for graduation: (1) four credits of language arts sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in English language arts; (2) three credits of mathematics sufficient to satisfy deleted text begin all ofdeleted text end the academic standards in mathematicsnew text begin as determined by the local school districtnew text end ; (3) three credits of science, including one credit to satisfy all the earth and space science standards for grades 9 through 12, one credit to satisfy all the life science standards for grades 9 through 12, and one credit to satisfy all the chemistry or physics standards for grades 9 through 12; (4) three and one-half credits of social studies, including credit for a course in government and citizenship in either grade 11 or 12 for students beginning grade 9 in the 2025-2026 school year and later or an advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other rigorous course on government and citizenship under section 120B.021, subdivision 1a, and a combination of other credits encompassing at least United States history, geography, government and citizenship, world history, and economics sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in social studies; (5) one credit of the arts sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in the arts; (6) credit sufficient to satisfy the state standards in physical education; (7) credits sufficient to satisfy the state standards in health upon adoption of statewide rules for implementing health standards under section 120B.021; and (8) a minimum of seven elective credits. (b) Students who begin grade 9 in the 2024-2025 school year and later must successfully complete a course for credit in personal finance in grade 10, 11, or 12. A teacher of a personal finance course that satisfies the graduation requirement must have a field license or out-of-field permission in agricultural education, business, family and consumer science, social studies, or math. Subd. 2. Credit equivalencies. (a) A one-half credit of economics taught in a school's agricultural, food, and natural resources education or business education program or department may fulfill a one-half credit in social studies under subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end , if the credit is sufficient to satisfy all of the academic standards in economics. (b) An agriculture science or career and technical education credit may fulfill the elective science credit required under subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end , if the credit meets the state physical science, life science, earth and space science, chemistry, or physics academic standards or a combination of these academic standards as approved by the district. An agriculture or career and technical education credit may fulfill the credit in chemistry or physics required under subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end , if the credit meets the state chemistry or physics academic standards as approved by the district. A student must satisfy either all of the chemistry academic standards or all of the physics academic standards prior to graduation. An agriculture science or career and technical education credit may not fulfill the required biology credit under subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end . (c) A career and technical education credit may fulfill a mathematics or arts credit requirement under subdivision 1, clause (2) or deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end . (d) An agricultural, food, and natural resources education teacher is not required to meet the requirements of Minnesota Rules, part 3505.1150, subpart 2, item B, to meet the credit equivalency requirements of paragraph (b) above. (e) A computer science credit may fulfill a mathematics credit requirement under subdivision 1, clause (2), if the credit meets state academic standards in mathematics. (f) A Project Lead the Way credit may fulfill a science or mathematics credit requirement under subdivision 1, clause (2) or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end , if the credit meets the state academic standards in science or mathematics. (g) An ethnic studies course may fulfill a social studies, language arts, arts, math, or science credit if the course meets the applicable state academic standards. An ethnic studies course may fulfill an elective credit if the course meets applicable local standards or other requirements. new text begin (h) A personal finance credit taught by a teacher with a field license or out-of-field permission in math may fulfill a mathematics credit requirement under subdivision 1, clause (2). new text end